scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     aaboozikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaboozikawaad
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboozikaw
     aadizookaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaadizookawaa
     aadizookaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaadizookawaa
     aadizookaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaadizookawaa
     aadizookaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaadizookawaan
     aadizookaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aadizookawaad
     aadizookaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaadizookawaad
     aadizookaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aadizookaw
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaagonwetawaa
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaagonwetawaa
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaagonwetawaa
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaagonwetawaan
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aagonwetawaad
     aagonwetaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaagonwetawaad
     aagonwetaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aagonwetaw
     aakoziishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: ndaakoziishkaagon
     aakoziishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3Sg: odaakoziishkaagon
     aakoziishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+?+3Sg: aakoziishkaagod
     aakoziishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+?+3Sg: ayaakoziishkaagod
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaanikanootamawaa
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikanootamawaa
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaanikanootamowaa
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikanootamawaan
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikanootamowaan
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikanootamawaad
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikanootamowaad
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanikanootamawaad
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanikanootamaw
     aanikanootamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: aanikanootamawishin
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanikanootawaa
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikanootawaa
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanikanootawaa
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikanootawaan
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikanootawaad
     aanikanootaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanikanootawaad
     aanikanootaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanikanootaw 
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanikeshkawaa
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikeshkawaa
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanikeshkawaa
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikeshkawaan
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikeshkawaad
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanikeshkawaad
     aanikeshkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanikeshkaw
     aanwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanwetawaa
     aanwetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanwetawaan
     aanwetaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanwetawaad
     aanwetaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanwetaw
     aanzikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanzikawaa
     aanzikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanzikawaa
     aanzikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3Sg: niyaanzikawaa
     aanzikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanzikawaan
     aanzikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanzikawaad
     aanzikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanzikawaad
     aanzikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanzikaw
     aapidabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaapidabiitawaa
     aapidabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaapidabiitawaan
     aapidabiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aapidabiitawaad
     aapidabiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aapidabiitaw
     aasonamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaasonamowaa
     aasonamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: oyaasonamowaan
     aasonamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aasonamowaad
     aasonamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: aasonamaw
     aatawenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaatawenamowaan
     aatawenamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aatawenamowaad
     aatawenamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aatawenamaw
     aawadamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawadamawaa
     aawadamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawadamawaan
     aawadamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawadamawaad
     aawadamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawadamaw
     aawadaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawadawaa
     aawadaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawadawaa
     aawadaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawadawaa
     aawadaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawadawaan
     aawadaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawadawaad
     aawadaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawadawaad
     aawadaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawadaw
     aawenaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawenawaa
     aawenaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawenawaa
     aawenaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawenawaa
     aawenaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawenawaan
     aawenaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawenawaad
     aawenaw+VTA+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawenawaad
     aawenaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawenaw
     aawetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawetawaa
     aawetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawetawaa
     aawetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawetawaa
     aawetaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawetawaan
     aawetaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawetawaad
     aawetaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawetawaad
     aawetaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawetaw
     aayaazhawiwebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaayaazhawiwebinamawaa
     aayaazhawiwebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaayaazhawiwebinamawaan
     aayaazhawiwebinamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aayaazhawiwebinamawaad
     aayaazhawiwebinamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aayaazhawiwebinamaw
     aazhawaatebii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaazhawaatebii'amawaa
     aazhawaatebii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaazhawaatebii'amawaan
     aazhawaatebii'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aazhawaatebii'amawaad
     aazhawaatebii'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aazhawaatebii'amaw
